Wyoming, session 2025, HB0109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-3-305(b) is amended to read:

23-3-305. Hunting from highway; entering or traveling
through private property without permission; penalty;
hunting at night without permission prohibited.

HB0109

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0361
(b) No person shall enter upon, travel through or
return across the private property of any person to take
wildlife, hunt, fish, collect antlers or horns, or trap
without the permission of the owner or person in charge of
the property. Violation of this subsection constitutes a
low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S.
23-6-202(a)(v) shall result in the person losing hunting,
fishing and trapping license privileges for two (2) years
from the date of the violation in addition to the
penalties. For purposes of this subsection, "travel through
and or return across" requires physically touching or
driving on the surface of the private property.

Section 2. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0109

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0361
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0109